yua.twol
Alphabet
 
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U W X Y Z
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u w x y z
%{V%}:a %{V%}:e %{V%}:i %{V%}:o %{V%}:u
 %>:%> ;


Sets

Vow   = A E I O U 
        Á É Í Ó Ú
        À È Ì Ò Ù
        a e i o u 
        á é í ó ú
        à è ì ò ù ;

UnaccVow = A E I O U 
           a e i o u ;

Cns   = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t w x y z ;


Rules

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Vowel harmony"
%{V%}:Vx <=> Vx Cns+ %>:0 _ ; where Vx in UnaccVow ;

! "Vowel harmony"
! %{V%}:o <=> o Cns %>: _ ;


! "a vowel harmony"
! %{V%}:a <=> a: Cns %>:0 _ ;

! "e vowel harmony"
! %{V%}:e <= e: Cns %>:0 _ ;

! "i vowel harmony"
! %{V%}:i <= i Cns %>:0 _ ;

! "o vowel harmony"
! %{V%}:o <=> o: Cns %>:0 _ ;

! "u vowel harmony"
! %{V%}:u <= u Cns %>:0 _ ;
